Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 9. Special Elections Following Incorporation

§ 22-23-901.
Election of officers; petition.

In addition to other provisions of law, any newly incorporated town may hold a special election for the election of officers to serve until successors are qualified following the next regularly scheduled election. Such special election shall not be held within ninety (90) days prior to a primary election.

Following completion of incorporation, persons who petitioned the board of county commissioners for incorporation may petition the county clerk, in writing, to hold a special election for the election of officers. Immediately upon receipt of a petition, the county clerk, in consultation with the petitioners, shall set the date for the election and shall conduct the election in accordance with law.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-358.1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-23-902.
Application; filing fee; form; names on ballot.

Candidates for office shall file an application for election and the required filing fee, with the county clerk, not more than fifty-five (55) nor less than thirty-five (35) days prior to the election. The election application shall be in substantially the following form:

ELECTION APPLICATION State of Wyoming County of ss I, , being years of age, a qualified elector of Election District No. , Precinct No. , Ward No. (if applicable), residing at , in the City of , State of Wyoming, do hereby request that my name be printed upon the Official Special Municipal Election Ballot for the special election to be held on , (year), in the City of , as a candidate for the office of I hereby declare that if elected I will qualify for the office. Dated the day of , (year). (Signature of Candidate)

Click to view

The county clerk shall place the name of each qualified candidate on the special election ballot.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-358.2; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see
§

22-2-110

.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), inserted “residing at
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ” near the beginning of the form, and deleted “
. . . . .
(Residence Address)” at the end of the form.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.